Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.175

Salon/shop or mobile unit requirements—Liability insurance—Complaints—Inspection—Registration—Use of motor homes—Posting of licenses.

(1) A salon/shop or mobile unit shall meet the following minimum requirements:

(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for sleeping or residential purposes;

(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the salon/shop or mobile unit;

(c) Any room used wholly or in part as a salon/shop or mobile unit shall not be used for residential purposes, except that toilet facilities may be used for both residential and business purposes;

(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as appropriate;

(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of chemicals used in the practices under this chapter;

(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and

(g) Certify that the salon/shop or mobile unit is covered by a public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage liability.

(2) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are necessary for safety and sanitation of salons/shops, personal services, or mobile units. The director may consult with the state board of health and the department of labor and industries in establishing minimum salon/shop, personal services, and mobile unit safety requirements.

(3) Personal services license holders shall certify coverage of a public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage liability.

(4) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a salon/shop or mobile unit has violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, or the rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every two years for an existing salon/shop or mobile unit, the director or the director's designee shall inspect each salon/shop or mobile unit. If the director determines that any salon/shop or mobile unit is not in compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice to the salon/shop or mobile unit. A salon/shop or mobile unit which fails to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties imposed by the director under RCW 18.235.110. The director may enter any salon/shop or mobile unit during business hours for the purpose of inspection. The director may contract with health authorities of local governments to conduct the inspections under this subsection.

(5) A salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit shall obtain a certificate of registration from the department of revenue.

(6) This section does not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile units if the motor home meets the health and safety standards of this section.

(7) Salon/shop or mobile unit licenses issued by the department must be posted in the salon/shop or mobile unit's reception area.

(8) Cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, and manicuring licenses issued by the department must be posted at the licensed person's workstation.

[ 2015 c 62 s 7; 2013 c 187 s 7; 2008 c 20 s 6. Prior: 2002 c 111 s 11; 2002 c 86 s 216; 1997 c 178 s 2; 1991 c 324 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.